Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7619
Aid to tribal councils.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide technical assistance and assessment of needs evaluations upon request to aid tribal councils in the development of contract proposals.

Laws 1998, LB 1070, § 15;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 59;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 682.